Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 135A.1582, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Parenting student" means a student enrolled at a public college or university who is the parent or legal guardian of or can claim as a dependent a child under the age of 18. new text begin (c) "Postsecondary institution" means an institution governed by the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities or a private postsecondary institution that offers in-person courses on a campus located in Minnesota and is an eligible institution as defined in section 136A.103. Institutions governed by the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota are requested to comply with this section. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d) new text end "Pregnancy or related conditions" has the meaning given in Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, section 106.2. deleted text begin (d) "Postsecondary institution" means an institution governed by the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities or a private postsecondary institution that offers in-person courses on a campus located in Minnesota and is an eligible institution as defined in section 136A.103. Institutions governed by the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota are requested to comply with this section. deleted text end new text begin (e) "Priority registration" means an opportunity to register for courses before the opening of general registration for the majority of undergraduate students. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 135A.1582, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Rights and protections. (a) A postsecondary institution may not require and the University of Minnesota is requested not to require a pregnant or parenting student, solely because of the student's status as a pregnant or parenting student or due to issues related to the student's pregnancy or parenting, to: (1) take a leave of absence or withdraw from the student's degree or certificate program; (2) limit the student's studies; (3) participate in an alternative program; (4) change the student's major, degree, or certificate program; or (5) refrain from joining or cease participating in any course, activity, or program at the college or university. (b) A postsecondary institution shall provide and the University of Minnesota is requested to provide reasonable modifications to a pregnant student, including modifications that: (1) would be provided to a student with a temporary medical condition; or (2) are related to the health and safety of the student and the student's unborn child, such as allowing the student to maintain a safe distance from substances, areas, and activities known to be hazardous to pregnant women or unborn children. (c) A postsecondary institution must and the University of Minnesota is requested to, for reasons related to a student's pregnancy, childbirth, or any resulting medical status or condition: (1) excuse the student's absence; (2) allow the student to make up missed assignments or assessments; (3) allow the student additional time to complete assignments in the same manner as the institution allows for a student with a temporary medical condition; and (4) provide the student with access to instructional materials and video recordings of lectures for classes for which the student has an excused absence under this section to the same extent that instructional materials and video recordings of lectures are made available to any other student with an excused absence. (d) A postsecondary institution must and the University of Minnesota is requested to allow a pregnant or parenting student to: (1) take a leave of absence; and (2) if in good academic standing at the time the student takes a leave of absence, return to the student's degree or certificate program in good academic standing without being required to reapply for admission. (e) deleted text begin If a postsecondary institution provides early registration for courses or programs at the institution for any group of students, the institution must provide and the University of Minnesota is requested to provide early registration for those courses or programs for pregnant or parenting students in the same manner.deleted text end new text begin A public postsecondary institution must provide proactive priority registration to pregnant and parenting students. The public postsecondary institution must: new text end new text begin (1) automatically assign eligible pregnant and parenting students a registration appointment time that occurs no later than the earliest general undergraduate registration period offered by the public postsecondary institution; new text end new text begin (2) ensure that priority registration is granted without a separate petition, discretionary approval, or case-by-case determination beyond verification of parenting status; new text end new text begin (3) provide written and electronic notice to all enrolled students at least once per academic year describing the rights and protections afforded under this subdivision, including the availability of priority registration; new text end new text begin (4) provide direct written and electronic notice to each student who self-identifies or is verified as a pregnant or parenting student informing the student of the student's eligibility for priority registration and how to register; and new text end new text begin (5) publish detailed information regarding parenting student rights, including priority registration procedures, on the public postsecondary institution's public website and in the student handbook. new text end